Arkansas, session 2025, HB1410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-8-304 is amended to read as follows:
21-8-304. Prohibited activities.
(a) No public servant shall use or attempt to use his or her official
position to secure special privileges or exemptions for himself or herself or
his or her spouse, child, parents, or other persons standing in the first
degree of relationship, or for those with whom he or she has a substantial
financial relationship that are not available to others except as may be
otherwise provided by law.
(b) No public servant shall accept employment or engage in any public
or professional activity while serving as a public official which he or she
might reasonably expect would require or induce him or her to disclose any
information acquired by him or her by reason of his or her official position
that is declared by law or rule to be confidential.
(c) No public servant shall disclose any such information gained by
reason of his or her position, nor shall he or she otherwise use such
information for his or her personal gain or benefit.
(d)(1) No public employee shall provide advance notice of an
*LGL057*
02-27-2025 10:32:49 LGL057

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1410
inspection to be conducted by a governmental body to any person, business, or
entity subject to an inspection when the purpose of the disclosure is to
improperly influence the outcome of the inspection.
(2) A public employee violates subdivision (d)(1) of this
section when he or she knowingly communicates information, directly or
indirectly, regarding the timing, scope, or details of an upcoming inspection
with the intent to:
(A) Alter or manipulate conditions to evade detection of
noncompliance or violations;
(B) Provide an unfair advantage to the inspected party; or
(C) Otherwise interfere with the integrity or impartiality
of the inspection process.
(3) A public employee found in violation of subdivision (d)(1)
of this section shall be subject to disciplinary action, including without
limitation suspension, termination, and any penalties provided by law.
(4) Subdivision (d)(1) of this section does not prohibit:
(A) Routine scheduling disclosures required by law;
(B) Public safety notifications; or
(C) Official communications necessary for the proper
administration of inspections.

/s/Unger














02-27-2025 10:32:49 LGL057